Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 165.01, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Bridge. "Bridge" is defined as a structure, including supports erected over a depression or an obstruction, such as water, a highway, or a railway, having a track or passageway for carrying traffic or other moving loads, and having an opening measured horizontally along the center of the roadway of ten feet or more between undercopings of abutments, between the spring line of arches, or between the extreme ends of openings for multiple boxes. Bridge also includes multiple pipes where the clear distance between openings is less than one-half of the smaller contiguous opening. This definition of a bridge includes deleted text begin only those railroad and pedestrian bridges overdeleted text end new text begin structures carrying vehicular traffic onnew text end a public highway or street.new text begin Structures carrying railroad, all-terrain vehicle, snowmobile, or pedestrian traffic are included in this definition only if the structures cross over a public highway or street.new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 165.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Bridge and Structure Inspection Program Manual (BSIPM). new text end new text begin "BSIPM" means the Bridge and Structure Inspection Program Manual developed by the Department of Transportation Bridge Office to outline inspection and inventory procedures for bridges and tunnels in Minnesota. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 165.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin National Tunnel Inspection Standards (NTIS). new text end new text begin "NTIS" means standards established by the Federal Highway Administration in Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, part 650, subpart E, incorporated here by reference. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 165.03, is amended to read: 165.03 deleted text begin STRENGTH OF BRIDGE;deleted text end INSPECTIONnew text begin AND LOAD RATINGnew text end . deleted text begin Subdivision 1. deleted text end deleted text begin Standards generally. deleted text end deleted text begin Each bridge, including a privately owned bridge, must conform to the strength, width, clearance, and safety standards imposed by the commissioner for the connecting highway or street. This subdivision applies to a bridge that is constructed after August 1, 1989, on any public highway or street. The bridge must have sufficient strength to support with safety the maximum vehicle weights allowed under sections 169.822 to 169.829 and must have the minimum width specified in section 165.04, subdivision 3. deleted text end Subd. 1a. Inspection. deleted text begin (a) Each bridge must be inspected annually, unless a longer interval not to exceed 24 months for bridges or 48 months for bridges classified as culverts is authorized by the commissioner. The commissioner's authorization must be based on factors including, but not limited to, the age and condition of the bridge, the rate of deterioration of the bridge, the type of structure, the susceptibility of the bridge to failure, and the characteristics of traffic on the bridge. The commissioner may require interim inspections at intervals of less than one year on bridges that are posted, bridges subjected to extreme scour conditions, bridges subject to significant substructure movement or settlement, and for other reasons as specified or inferred in the AASHTO manual. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) Additional requirements apply to structures meeting the NBIS definition of a bridge: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) Underwater structural elements must be inspected at regular intervals not to exceed 60 months. The commissioner may require inspections at intervals of less than 60 months on certain underwater structural elements based on factors including, but not limited to, construction material, environment, age, scour characteristics, the condition ratings from past inspections, and any known deficiencies. deleted text end deleted text begin (2) Fracture critical members, or FCMs, must receive a hands-on fracture critical inspection at intervals not to exceed 24 months. The commissioner may require inspections at intervals of less than 24 months on certain FCMs based on factors including, but not limited to, age, traffic characteristics, and any known deficiencies. deleted text end deleted text begin (3) The commissioner may establish criteria to determine the level and frequency of these inspections. If warranted by special circumstances, the commissioner retains the authority to determine the inspection type and required inspection frequency for any bridge on the state inventory. deleted text end new text begin (a) Each bridge meeting the definition of a bridge in section 650.305 of the National Bridge Inspection Standards (NBIS) must be inspected at intervals based on the requirements in section 650.311 of the NBIS. The commissioner may require inspections at intervals less than those required by the NBIS based on factors including but not limited to the age and condition of the bridge, the rate of deterioration of the bridge, the type of structure, the susceptibility of the bridge to failure, and the characteristics of traffic on the bridge. new text end new text begin (b) Each bridge meeting the definition of a bridge under section 165.01, subdivision 3, but not meeting the definition of a bridge in section 650.305 of the NBIS must be inspected at intervals determined by the commissioner based on factors including but not limited to the age and condition of the bridge, the rate of deterioration of the bridge, the type of structure, the susceptibility of the bridge to failure, and the characteristics of traffic on the bridge. new text end new text begin (c) The interval tolerances outlined in section 650.311, paragraph (e), of the NBIS apply to all bridge inspection types. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The thoroughness of each inspection depends on deleted text begin suchdeleted text end factors deleted text begin asdeleted text end new text begin includingnew text end age, traffic characteristics, state of maintenance, and known deficiencies. The evaluation of these factors is the responsibility of the engineer assigned the responsibility for inspection as defined by the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end . new text begin (e) For railroad, all-terrain vehicle, snowmobile, or pedestrian bridges, only those spans passing over a public highway or street are required to be inspected. new text end Subd. 2. Inspection and inventory responsibilities; rules; forms. (a) The commissioner deleted text begin of transportation willdeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end adopt the National Bridge Inspection Standards (NBIS) established by the Federal Highway Administration in Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, part 650, subpart C, or its successor documents, for structures meeting the NBIS definition of a bridge. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end establish inspection and inventory standards for structures defined as bridges by section 165.01, subdivision 3. (b) The commissioner deleted text begin of transportation shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end adopt official inventory and bridge inspection report forms for use in making bridge inspections by the owners or highway authorities specified by this subdivision. Inspections must be made at regular intervals, not to exceed the intervals outlined in subdivision 1a, by the following owner or official: (1) the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end for all bridges located wholly or partially within or over the right-of-way of a state trunk highway; (2) the county highway engineer for all bridges located wholly or partially within or over the right-of-way of any county or town road, or any street within a municipality that does not have a city engineer regularly employed; (3) the city engineer for all bridges located wholly or partially within or over the right-of-way of any street located within or along municipal limits; (4) the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end in case of a toll bridge that is used by the general public and that is not inspected and certified under subdivision 6deleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin ,new text end provideddeleted text begin ,deleted text end that the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end may assess the owner for the costs of the inspection; (5) the owner of a bridge over a public highway or street or that carries a roadway designated for public use by a public authoritydeleted text begin ,deleted text end if not required to be inventoried and inspected under clause (1), (2), (3), or (4)deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6) the owner of a private vehicular bridge that is open to the public and is immediately connected to a public road on both ends of the bridge, as described in section 650.303 of the NBIS; and new text end new text begin (7) the agency operating the rail transit system for any rail transit bridge crossing over a public highway or street, regardless of the bridge location in the right-of-way. new text end (c) The commissioner deleted text begin of transportation shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end prescribe the inspection and inventory procedures required to administer the bridge inspection program in Minnesota and has the authority to establish and publish standards that describe the inspection and inventory requirements to ensure compliance with paragraph (a). The owner or highway authority deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end inspect and inventory in accordance with these standards and furnish the commissioner with deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end data deleted text begin as may bedeleted text end necessary to maintain a central inventory. Subd. 3. County inventory and inspection records and reports. The county engineer deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end maintain a complete inventory record of all bridges as set forth in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (2), deleted text begin withdeleted text end new text begin includingnew text end the inspection reports deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end , and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end certify annually to the commissioner, as prescribed by the commissioner, that inspections have been made at regular intervals, not to exceed the intervals outlined in subdivision 1a. A report of the inspections must be filed annuallydeleted text begin , on or before February 15 of each year,deleted text end with the county auditor or town clerkdeleted text begin ,deleted text end or the governing body of the municipality. The report must identify any deficiency requiring action, including the legal posting of load limits or the need to have a load rating analysis performed, on any bridge or structure that is found to be understrength or unsafe. The report may also contain other recommendations for improving the safety of understrength or unsafe bridges. Subd. 4. Municipal inventory and inspection records and reports. The city engineer deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end maintain a complete inventory record of all bridges as set forth in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (3), deleted text begin withdeleted text end new text begin includingnew text end the inspection reports deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end , and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end certify annually to the commissioner, as prescribed by the commissioner, that inspections have been made at regular intervals, not to exceed the intervals outlined in subdivision 1a. A report of the inspections must be filed annuallydeleted text begin , on or before February 15 of each year,deleted text end with the governing body of the municipality. The report must contain recommendations for the correction of or legal posting of load limits on any bridge or structure that is found to be understrength or unsafe. Subd. 5. Agreement. Agreements may be made among the various units of governmentsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end or between governmental units and qualified engineering personnel to carry out the responsibilities for the bridge inspections and reportsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end as established by subdivision 2. Subd. 6. Other bridges. The owner of a toll bridge and the owner of a bridge described in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (5), deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end certify to the commissioner, as prescribed by the commissioner, that inspections of the bridge or culvert have been made at regular intervals, not to exceed the intervals outlined in subdivision 1a. The certification must be accompanied by a report of the inspection. The report must contain recommendations for the correction of or legal posting of load limitations if the bridge is found to be understrength or unsafe. Subd. 6a. Bridge load rating and posting. (a) The term "posting" means the placement of regulatory signs at a bridge indicating the safe load carrying capacity of the bridge. (b) Each structure required to be inspected under subdivision 2, paragraph (a),new text begin that carries roadway vehicular trafficnew text end must be load rated to determine its safe load carrying capacity, and this rating must be reported on a structure inventory sheet form provided by the commissioner deleted text begin of transportationdeleted text end . A structure must be rerated when it is determined that a significant change has occurred in the condition of the structure or due to additional dead load placed on the structure since the last load rating. Load ratings must be reviewed and the structure rerated if necessary when the allowable legal load using the structure is increased. Changes in the load rating of a bridge must be indicated on the structure inventory sheet form. (c) If it is determined that the maximum legal load under state law exceeds the load permitted on the structure under the operating rating stress level assigned, the bridge must be posted. Posting signs adopted by the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be used for the posting. The owner or highway authority deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end post the bridge in accordance with the posted load assigned by the commissioner. Subd. 7. Department of Natural Resources bridge. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 2, the commissioners of transportation and natural resources deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end negotiate a memorandum of understanding that governs the inspection of bridges owned, operated, or maintained by the commissioner of natural resources. (b) The memorandum of understanding must provide for: (1) the inspection and inventory of bridges subject to federal law or regulations; (2) the frequency of inspection of bridges described in subdivision 1a; and (3) who may perform inspections required under the memorandum of understanding. deleted text begin Subd. 8. deleted text end deleted text begin Biennial report on bridge inspection quality assurance. deleted text end deleted text begin By February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the commissioner shall submit a report electronically to the members of the senate and house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance concerning quality assurance for bridge inspections. At a minimum, the report must: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) summarize the bridge inspection quality assurance and quality control procedures used in Minnesota; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) identify any substantive changes to quality assurance and quality control procedures made in the previous two years; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) summarize and provide a briefing on findings from bridge inspection quality reviews performed in the previous two years; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) identify actions taken and planned in response to findings from bridge inspection quality reviews performed in the previous two years; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) summarize the results of any bridge inspection compliance review by the Federal Highway Administration; and deleted text end deleted text begin (6) identify actions in response to the Federal Highway Administration compliance review taken by the department in order to reach full compliance. deleted text end Sec. 5. new text begin [165.16] BRIDGE STRENGTH. new text end new text begin Each bridge, including a privately owned bridge, must conform to the strength, width, clearance, and safety standards imposed by the commissioner for the connecting highway or street. Any bridge on a public highway or street constructed after August 1, 1989, must have sufficient strength to support with safety the maximum vehicle weights allowed under sections 169.822 to 169.829 and must have the minimum width specified in section 165.04, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [165.17] TUNNEL INSPECTIONS. new text end new text begin Each tunnel meeting the definition of a tunnel in section 650.505 of the National Tunnel Inspection Standards (NTIS) must be inspected at intervals based on the requirements in section 650.511, paragraph (b), of the NTIS. The commissioner may require inspections at intervals less than those required by the NTIS based on factors including but not limited to the age and condition of the tunnel, the rate of deterioration of the tunnel, the type of structure, the susceptibility of the tunnel to failure, and traffic characteristics. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Expiration. (a) If submission of a report by the commissioner to the legislature, including but not limited to chairs and ranking minority members of a legislative committee or the Legislative Coordinating Commission, is required by law, the requirement to submit the report expires in accordance with this section. (b) For a law enacted before January 1, 2023, the requirement to submit a report to the legislature expires as follows: (1) for an annual report, on January 1, 2025; or (2) for a biennial or less frequent report, on January 1, 2026. (c) For a law enacted on or after January 1, 2023, the requirement to submit a report to the legislature expires as follows: (1) for an annual report, three years after the date of enactment; or (2) for a biennial or less frequent report, five years after the date of enactment. new text begin (d) Reports required under the following sections expire on January 1, 2036: new text end new text begin (1) 165.03, subdivision 8; new text end new text begin (2) 174.03, subdivision 12, paragraph (d); new text end new text begin (3) 174.065; new text end new text begin (4) 174.185, subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (5) 174.247; and new text end new text begin (6) 174.75, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (e) Reports required under sections 161.088, subdivision 7, and 174.56, subdivisions 1 and 2, expire on January 1, 2036, except the information provided by these reports must continue to be posted on the department's website for the duration required pursuant to the department's record retention schedule. new text end new text begin (f) Reports that do not have an expiration date provided in the enacting law expire ten years from the date of enactment. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 174.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Exceptions. This section does not apply to: (1) a law that establishes a requirement with general applicability for an agency or agencies to submit a report, including but not limited to reports and information under sections 14.05, subdivision 5, and 14.116; new text begin (2) a law that requires other agencies to produce a report in collaboration with the department; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end a law that specifies a reporting expiration date or a date for the submission of a final report; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end information required by law to be included in a budget submission to the legislature under section 16A.11; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end the plans required under section 174.03, subdivisions 1a, 1b, and 1c;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end the forecast information requirements under section 174.03, subdivision 9deleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (6) the reports required under sections 161.088, subdivision 7; 161.089; 161.3203, subdivision 4; 165.03, subdivision 8; 174.03, subdivision 12; 174.065; 174.185, subdivision 3; 174.247; 174.56, subdivisions 1 and 2; and 174.75, subdivision 3. deleted text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.38, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Use of funds. (a) The commissioner must determine permissible uses of financial assistance under this section, which are limited to: (1) construction and maintenance of bicycle, trail, and pedestrian infrastructure, including but not limited to safe routes to school infrastructure and bicycle facilities and centers; and (2) noninfrastructure programming, including activities as specified in section 174.40, subdivision 7a, paragraph (b). (b) Of the amount made available in each fiscal year, the firstnew text begin ten percent, up tonew text end $500,000new text begin ,new text end is for deleted text begin grantsdeleted text end new text begin programmingnew text end to develop, maintain, and implement active transportation safety curriculum for youth ages five to 14 years old, and if remaining funds are available, for (1) youth ages 15 to 17 years old, (2) adult active transportation safety programs, and (3) adult learn-to-ride programs. The curriculum must include resources for teachers and must meet the model training materials requirements under section 123B.935, subdivision 4. Sec. 10. new text begin [174.68] TRUCK PARKING IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin (c) "Program" means the truck parking improvement program established in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin A truck parking improvement program is established to support improvements related to truck parking access, availability, and safety. Money may be appropriated from the trunk highway fund or the general fund for truck parking capacity improvements at public, private, or partnership-operated sites. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program administration. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish program requirements in conformance with this section, including but not limited to a competitive process for project evaluation and discretionary award of financial assistance. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must conduct a solicitation for projects under the program in each fiscal year for which money is available. The commissioner must make reasonable efforts to publicize each solicitation among all eligible recipients. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may authorize expenditures, provide grants, enter into partnerships with local governments or private entities, including truck stops, or provide other financial assistance for a truck parking improvement project. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner is prohibited from expending more than three percent of available money in a fiscal year under this section on program administration. new text end new text begin (e) No actions taken under this section are to be construed as authorizing the commercialization of any public rest area. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin Eligible recipients of financial assistance under this section are: new text end new text begin (1) the Department of Transportation; new text end new text begin (2) a county; new text end new text begin (3) a statutory or home rule charter city that receives aid from the municipal state-aid street fund under chapter 162; new text end new text begin (4) a statutory or home rule charter city or a town in partnership with a political subdivision under clause (2) or (3); new text end new text begin (5) a metropolitan planning organization; new text end new text begin (6) a public or private port authority; new text end new text begin (7) an established truck stop business, commercial warehouse site, large retail company, or trucking service repair company; and new text end new text begin (8) an entity operating under a public-private partnership authorized by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Project evaluation. new text end new text begin In developing and maintaining criteria to evaluate applications, the commissioner must gather input from the Minnesota Freight Advisory Committee and consult with the Statewide Freight Investment Committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Use of money. new text end new text begin Financial assistance under the program may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) predesign, design, engineering, acquisition of land or permanent easements, environmental analysis and remediation, construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of truck parking facilities; new text end new text begin (2) construction and maintenance of truck parking information systems; new text end new text begin (3) construction and maintenance of bathroom facilities that serve truck parking facilities; new text end new text begin (4) installation and relocation of utilities necessary for additional truck parking capacity; new text end new text begin (5) local match for federal grants for truck safety, truck parking, and hydrogen or electric truck fueling improvements; new text end new text begin (6) truck parking studies; and new text end new text begin (7) lighting, fencing, or security systems that are appurtenant to the construction of new parking spaces at a public rest area, an established truck stop business, commercial warehouse site, large retail company, or trucking service repair company. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Public information. new text end new text begin The commissioner must publish information regarding the program on the department's website. The information must include: new text end new text begin (1) an overview of program requirements and implementation; new text end new text begin (2) identification of all projects considered in each project selection round; and new text end new text begin (3) a review of each selected project, with amounts and sources of funding. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, subdivisions 6, 15, 17, and 50, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06052 161.14 NAMES AND DESIGNATIONS OF CERTAIN HIGHWAYS. Subd. 6. Veterans' Evergreen Memorial Drive. (a) That portion of Road No. 185, known as Trunk Highway 23 in St. Louis, Pine, and Carlton Counties, is hereby named and designated "Veterans' Evergreen Memorial Drive" in memory of veterans of St. Louis, Pine, and Carlton Counties. (b) The commissioner shall install a bronze plaque with an inscription to read, "In grateful memory of all men and women from Carlton, Pine, and St. Louis Counties who served in World War I, World War II, Korea, Vietnam, and all future conflicts." Subd. 15. Glacial Ridge Trail. (a) The following route is named and designated the "Glacial Ridge Trail": Beginning at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 71, at its intersection with Trunk Highway No. 12, in Willmar; thence extending north and northeasterly along Trunk Highway No. 71 to its intersection with Kandiyohi County Highway 90; thence extending east along said Highway 90 to its junction with Kandiyohi County State-Aid Highway (SAH) 9; thence extending north and northeasterly along said Highway 9 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 26; thence extending east along said Highway 26 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 8; thence extending north along said Highway 8 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 10, south of Green Lake; thence northerly along said Highway 10 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 30 in Spicer; thence extending northerly and easterly along said Highway 30 to its junction with Kandiyohi County SAH 2; thence extending northerly on said Highway 2 to a highway easterly of Long Lake and on the north side of Irving Township; thence westerly and southerly on the township road through Sections 4 and 5 of Irving Township to Kandiyohi County Highway 103 to its junction with a township road running south through Sections 6, 7, and 18 of Irving Township to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 40; thence west on said Highway 40, across Trunk Highway No. 23 to the junction of SAH 40 and SAH 9 in the city of New London; thence via city streets to Trunk Highway No. 9 in New London; thence extending westerly on said Highway No. 9, to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 71; thence southerly on said Highway No. 71 to Kandiyohi County SAH 48; thence westerly through Sibley State Park and northerly, across Trunk Highway No. 9, to Colfax Township road running westerly through Sections 27, 22, 21, 20, and 19, of said township, and Section 24 of Norway Lake Township to Kandiyohi County Road 1, thence north to the township road on the south side of Sections 13 and 14 of Norway Lake Township to Kandiyohi County Road 115 to its junction with Kandiyohi County SAH 36 and west on said Highway 36 to a Norway Lake Township Road running northerly through Section No. 5 to the Pope County line and there joining a township road in Section 32 of Lake Johanna Township; thence northerly and westerly through Sections 32 and 31 to Trunk Highway No. 104; thence northerly on said Highway No. 104 to a township road; running westerly through Sections 24 and 23 of Gilchrist Township to Pope County Highway 84; thence westerly on said Highway 84 to the west side of Section No. 15; thence northerly and westerly on a township road through Sections 16 and 17 to Pope County SAH 8; thence north on said Highway 8, in Section No. 8, to a township road; thence in a general northwesterly direction on township roads to Trunk Highway No. 104. And beginning in the Community of Terrace, in Section No. 33 of Chippewa Falls Township, Pope County, Minnesota; thence northwesterly on Pope County SAH 21 to a township road; thence westerly on said township road to Trunk Highway No. 104; thence along said Highway No. 104 in a westerly and northerly direction to Pope County SAH 18; thence westerly on said Highway 18 to Pope County SAH 17; thence northerly on said Highway 17 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 104; thence northerly to Trunk Highway No. 28 in Glenwood; thence easterly on said Highway No. 28 to its junction with Pope County SAH 25; thence northerly and easterly to the city of Villard; thence to Trunk Highway No. 28 and easterly to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 71; thence northerly on said Highway No. 71 to the city of Sauk Centre. And beginning in the city of Villard on Pope County SAH 28; thence westerly on said SAH 28 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 29. And beginning at the south limits of the city of Alexandria on Trunk Highway No. 29; thence southerly to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 55; thence southeasterly to 14th Avenue Northeast and the adjacent Mount Lookout Rest Area in the city of Glenwood; thence westerly on said 14th Avenue NE to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 29; thence southerly on said Highway No. 29 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 104 in the city of Glenwood. And beginning in the city of Glenwood at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 104 and Lakeshore Drive; thence westerly on Lakeshore Drive into the city of Long Beach to Golf Course Road; thence on Golf Course Road to Trunk Highway No. 29; thence on said Highway No. 29 to Pope County SAH 24; thence westerly on said SAH 24 to the Pelican Lake Road; thence southerly on said road to Trunk Highway No. 29; thence southerly and westerly on said Highway No. 29 through the city of Starbuck to Pope County SAH 41; thence southerly on said SAH 41 to Glacial Lakes State Park. And beginning on Pope County SAH 41 at its junction with Pope County Highway 74; thence easterly on said County Highway 74 to its junction with Pope County SAH 13; thence southerly on said SAH 13 to its junction with a township road on the north side of Section 5 of Rolling Forks Township; thence easterly on said township road through Sections 5, 4, and 3 of Rolling Forks Township; said road continuing as the township road through Sections 34, 35, and 36 of Barsness Township to its junction with Pope County SAH 19. And beginning at the junction of Trunk Highway No. 104 and Pope County SAH 19; thence southerly on said SAH 19 to the Swift County line where it becomes Swift County SAH 25; thence on said SAH 25 to the Swift Falls Community Park. And beginning at the junction of Swift County SAH 25 and Swift County Highway 87; thence southerly and easterly on said Highway 87 to its junction with a township road in Section 12 of Camp Lake Township; thence easterly and northerly on township roads through Sections 12 and 1 of Camp Lake Township to a junction with a township road in Section No. 6 of Kerkhoven Township; thence easterly and southerly on township roads through Sections No. 6, 5, 4, 3, 2, and 11 to its junction with Swift SAH 28; thence easterly on said SAH 28 to its junction with Swift County Highway 95; thence southerly on said Highway 95 through Monson Lake Memorial Park to its junction with Swift County SAH 18; thence easterly on said SAH 18 to the Kandiyohi county line where it becomes Kandiyohi County SAH 40; thence on said SAH 40 to Trunk Highway No. 104. And beginning at the junction of Kandiyohi County SAH 36 and a township road in Section No. 8 of Norway Lake Township; thence southerly on said SAH 36 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 9; thence on said Highway No. 9 to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 104; thence south on said Highway No. 104, through the city of Sunburg to the junction of said Highway No. 104 and Kandiyohi County SAH 40; thence easterly on said SAH 40 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 5. And beginning at the junction of Kandiyohi County SAH 48 and SAH 38; thence southerly on said SAH 38 to Kandiyohi County SAH 40; thence westerly on said SAH 40 to its junction with Kandiyohi SAH 5; thence southerly on said SAH 5 to its junction with a township road in Section No. 9 of Dovre Township; thence easterly on said township road through Sections No. 9, 10, and 11 to its intersection with Kandiyohi County SAH 27; thence easterly on said SAH 27 to its junction with a township road in Section No. 13 of Dovre Township; thence on said township road through Sections No. 13, 14, 23, 25, and 36 of Dovre Township to its junction with Trunk Highway No. 71. (b) The respective road authorities of the highways over which the route described in this subdivision is located shall place and maintain the "Glacial Ridge Trail" emblem, an arrowhead design with red, black, and white colors, on the highways under their jurisdiction to adequately mark the highways as "Glacial Ridge Trail." (c) The state Transportation Department shall make sufficient additional markers to enable the counties to mark those portions of the trail not maintained by the state. Subd. 17. Hiawatha-Appleblossom Scenic Drive. (a) The following described route is named and designated the "Hiawatha-Appleblossom Scenic Drive." Beginning at a point in LaCrescent on Houston County State-Aid Highway 29; thence extending northerly along Houston County State-Aid Highway 29 to the Winona County line; thence extending northerly and westerly along Winona County State-Aid Highway 1 to its junction with Winona County State-Aid Highway 12; thence easterly along Winona County State-Aid Highway 12 to its intersection with Trunk Highway marked 61 in Dakota and there terminating. Also from the junction of Winona County State-Aid Highway 1 and Winona County State-Aid Highway 12; thence westerly and northerly along Winona County State-Aid Highway 12 to its intersection with Winona County State-Aid Highway 3; thence easterly and northerly along Winona County State-Aid Highway 3 to its intersection with Trunk Highway marked 61 and there terminating. (b) The respective road authorities having jurisdiction of the highways over which the route described in paragraph (a) is located shall adopt and place suitable marking signs on their respective highways to adequately mark the route as "Hiawatha-Appleblossom Scenic Drive." Subd. 50. King of Trails. (a) The following described route, signed as Trunk Highway 75 on July 1, 2001, is designated the "King of Trails": Constitutional Route No. 6 from its intersection with the Minnesota-Canada border southerly to its intersection with Legislative Route No. 175 at or near the city of Crookston, then Legislative Route No. 175 southwesterly and southerly to its intersection with Constitutional Route No. 6 between the cities of Halstad and Hendrum, then Constitutional Route No. 6 southerly to its intersection with the Minnesota-Iowa border. (b) The commissioner shall adopt a suitable marking design to mark the highway and erect appropriate signs, subject to section 161.139.